Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,135
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; relevant information; release to authorized agency.

Upon written request to an insurer by an authorized agency, an insurer or person acting on behalf of the insurer shall release to a requesting authorized agency any or all relevant information relating to any specific motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance fraud which the insurer may possess. Relevant information may include, but shall not be limited to:

(1) Insurance policy information relevant to the motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance fraud under investigation, including any application for such a policy;

(2) Policy premium records;

(3) History of previous claims made by the insured;

(4) Information relating to the investigation of the motor vehicle theft or motor vehicle insurance fraud, including statements of any person, proof of loss, and notice of loss; and

(5) Any other relevant evidence or information which the authorized agency reasonably believes is important.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 2.